Rhode Island, session 2026, SB2767.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 39-2.2 of the General Laws entitled "Rhode Island Utility Fair Share
Roadway Repair Act" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
39-2.2-6. Roadwork closure notice.
Any public utility company that needs to completely close any portion of any state or
municipal highway, in order to perform roadway repairs or other related work, shall provide to all
residential and business property owners located within one thousand feet (1,000 ft) of the road
closure, with at least forty-eight (48) hours' notice of the scheduled road closure.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC005760
========